Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-927
Applied technology and occupational education, defined.

Applied technology and occupational education shall mean those instructional programs at the associate degree level or below including associate of applied science degrees, diplomas, certificates, and course work intended to prepare individuals for immediate entry into a specific occupation or career, to upgrade skills, or to acquire new skills. Programs in this category may include the award of a formal degree, diploma, or certificate upon completion of the program.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 11;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 12.